North Carolina, session 2025, SB232.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-5(o), the State Board of Community
Colleges shall calculate the number of full-time equivalent students (FTE) required for the
Harnett Main Campus to maintain its multicampus center status by combining the total number
of FTE at the Harnett Main Campus with the total number of FTE at the Harnett Health Sciences
Center.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-5(o), the State Board of Community
Colleges shall calculate the number of full-time equivalent students (FTE) required for the
Chatham Main Campus to maintain its multicampus center status by combining the total number
of FTE at the Chatham Main Campus with the total number of FTE at the Chatham Health
Sciences Center.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*S232-v-1*